Utah statutes.
63J-4-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Committee" means the Resource Development Coordinating Committee created by this chapter.

(2)  "Director" means the chief administrative officer of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget appointed as provided in this chapter.

(3)  "Office" means the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget created by this chapter.

(4)  "Political subdivision" means a county, municipality, local district, special service district, school district, interlocal cooperation agreement entity, or any administrative subunit of them.

(5)  "State planning coordinator" means the person appointed as planning coordinator as provided in this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

